fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX B o       rentque         eo        
SFX B o       rentqve         eo        
SFX B o       rentne          eo        
SFX B o       rentve          eo        
SFX B o       rentue          eo          
SFX B eo      e               eo        
SFX B eo      eque            eo        
SFX B eo      eqve            eo        
SFX B eo      ene             eo        
SFX B eo      eve             eo        
SFX B eo      eue             eo          
SFX B o       te              eo        
SFX B o       teque           eo        
SFX B o       teqve           eo        
SFX B o       tene            eo        
SFX B o       teve            eo        
SFX B o       teue            eo          
SFX B eo      eto             eo        
SFX B eo      etoque          eo        
SFX B eo      etoqve          eo        
SFX B eo      etone           eo        
SFX B eo      etove           eo        
SFX B eo      etoue           eo          
SFX B o       tote            eo        
SFX B o       toteque         eo        
SFX B o       toteqve         eo        
SFX B o       totene          eo        
SFX B o       toteve          eo        
SFX B o       toteue          eo          
SFX B o       nto             eo        
SFX B o       ntoque          eo        
SFX B o       ntoqve          eo        
SFX B o       ntone           eo        
SFX B o       ntove           eo        
SFX B o       ntoue           eo          
SFX B o       re              eo        
SFX B o       reque           eo        
SFX B o       reqve           eo        
SFX B o       rene            eo        
SFX B o       reve            eo        
SFX B o       reue            eo          
SFX B o       ndum            eo        
SFX B o       ndvm            eo        
SFX B o       ndumque         eo        
SFX B o       ndvmqve         eo        
SFX B o       ndumne          eo        
SFX B o       ndvmne          eo        
SFX B o       ndumve          eo        
SFX B o       ndumue          eo          
SFX B o       ndvmve          eo        
SFX B o       ndi             eo        
SFX B o       ndique          eo        
SFX B o       ndiqve          eo        
SFX B o       ndine           eo        
SFX B o       ndive           eo        
SFX B o       ndiue           eo          
SFX B o       ndo             eo        
SFX B o       ndoque          eo        
SFX B o       ndoqve          eo        
SFX B o       ndone           eo        
SFX B o       ndove           eo        
SFX B o       ndoue           eo          
SFX B o       ns              eo        
SFX B o       nsque           eo        
SFX B o       nsqve           eo        
SFX B o       nsne            eo        
SFX B o       nsve            eo        
SFX B o       nsue            eo          
SFX B o       ntem            eo        
SFX B o       ntemque         eo        
SFX B o       ntemqve         eo        
SFX B o       ntemne          eo        
SFX B o       ntemue          eo        
SFX B o       ntemve          eo          
SFX B o       ntis            eo        
SFX B o       ntisque         eo        
SFX B o       ntisqve         eo        
SFX B o       ntisne          eo        
SFX B o       ntisve          eo        
SFX B o       ntisue          eo          
SFX B o       nti             eo        
SFX B o       ntique          eo        
SFX B o       ntiqve          eo        
SFX B o       ntine           eo        
SFX B o       ntive           eo        
SFX B o       ntiue           eo          
SFX B o       nte             eo        
SFX B o       nteque          eo        
SFX B o       nteqve          eo        
SFX B o       ntene           eo        
SFX B o       nteve           eo        
SFX B o       nteue           eo          
SFX B o       ntes            eo        
SFX B o       ntesque         eo        
SFX B o       ntesqve         eo        
SFX B o       ntesne          eo        
SFX B o       ntesve          eo        
SFX B o       ntesue          eo          
SFX B o       ntium           eo        
SFX B o       ntivm           eo        
SFX B o       ntiumque        eo        
SFX B o       ntivmqve        eo        
SFX B o       ntiumne         eo        
SFX B o       ntivmne         eo        
SFX B o       ntiumve         eo        
SFX B o       ntiumue         eo          
SFX B o       ntivmve         eo        
SFX B o       ntum           eo        
SFX B o       ntvm           eo        
SFX B o       ntumque        eo        
SFX B o       ntvmqve        eo        
SFX B o       ntumne         eo        
SFX B o       ntvmne         eo        
SFX B o       ntumve         eo        
SFX B o       ntumue         eo          
SFX B o       ntvmve         eo        
SFX B o       ntibus          eo        
SFX B o       ntibvs          eo        
SFX B o       ntibusque       eo        
SFX B o       ntibvsqve       eo        
SFX B o       ntibusne        eo        
SFX B o       ntibvsne        eo        
SFX B o       ntibusve        eo        
SFX B o       ntibusue        eo          
SFX B o       ntibvsve        eo        
SFX B o       ntia            eo        
SFX B o       ntiaque         eo        
SFX B o       ntiaqve         eo        
SFX B o       ntiane          eo        
SFX B o       ntiave          eo        
SFX B o       ntiaue          eo          
SFX B o       or              eo        
SFX B o       orque           eo        
SFX B o       orqve           eo        
SFX B o       orne            eo        
SFX B o       orve            eo        
SFX B o       orue            eo          
SFX B o       ris             eo        
SFX B o       risque          eo        
SFX B o       risqve          eo        
SFX B o       risne           eo        
SFX B o       risve           eo        
SFX B o       risue           eo          
SFX B o       tur             eo        
SFX B o       tvr             eo        
SFX B o       turque          eo        
SFX B o       turqve          eo        
SFX B o       turne           eo        
SFX B o       tvrne           eo        
SFX B o       turve           eo        
SFX B o       turue           eo          
SFX B o       tvrve           eo        
SFX B o       mur             eo        
SFX B o       mvr             eo        
SFX B o       murque          eo        
SFX B o       mvrqve          eo        
SFX B o       murne           eo        
SFX B o       mvrne           eo        
SFX B o       murve           eo        
SFX B o       murue           eo          
SFX B o       mvrve           eo        
SFX B o       mini            eo        
SFX B o       minique         eo        
SFX B o       miniqve         eo        
SFX B o       minine          eo        
SFX B o       minive          eo        
SFX B o       miniue          eo          
SFX B o       ntur            eo        
SFX B o       ntvr            eo        
SFX B o       nturque         eo        
SFX B o       ntvrqve         eo        
SFX B o       nturne          eo        
SFX B o       ntvrne          eo        
SFX B o       nturve          eo        
SFX B o       nturue          eo          
SFX B o       ntvrve          eo        
SFX B o       bar             eo        
SFX B o       barque          eo        
SFX B o       barqve          eo        
SFX B o       barne           eo        
SFX B o       barve           eo        
SFX B o       barue           eo          
SFX B o       baris           eo        
SFX B o       barisque        eo        
SFX B o       barisqve        eo        
SFX B o       barisne         eo        
SFX B o       barisve         eo        
SFX B o       barisue         eo          
SFX B o       bare            eo        
SFX B o       bareque         eo        
SFX B o       bareqve         eo        
SFX B o       barene          eo        
SFX B o       bareve          eo        
